Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 9 Frozen Desserts

21-9-1.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the words and phrases defined in this section are used in this chapter in the sense given them in the following definitions:

“Advertise” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes.

“Director of health” means the director of health of Rhode Island.

“Frozen dessert mix” means any unfrozen mixture that can be used in the manufacture of frozen desserts or freezer milk shakes and substitutes or imitations of them offered for sale or resale.

“Frozen dessert plant” means any building, establishment, place, or premises or any part of it where frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes are manufactured into a form for distribution, and any building, establishment, place, or premises or any part of it where equipment for the manufacture of frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes is washed, sterilized, kept, or maintained.

“Frozen desserts” are products to be consumed in frozen form and include, but not be limited to: ice cream and frozen custard, ice milk, sherbet, non-fruit sherbet, water ice, non fruit water ice, mellorine, goat’s milk ice cream and goat’s milk ice milk, frozen yogurt, frozen lowfat or lowfat frozen yogurt, frozen nonfat yogurt or nonfat frozen yogurt, quiescently frozen confection, quiescently frozen dairy confection, frozen dietary dairy dessert, dietary frozen dessert, manufactured desserts mix, freezer made shake, freezer made milk shake, parevine, lo-mel, lactose reduced ice cream, lactose reduced ice milk, other similar frozen products, substitutes, and imitations of them.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter: (i) upon a frozen dessert and/or frozen dessert mix or any of its container or wrappers, or (ii) accompanying such products.

“Manufacture” means assemble, process, prepare, produce, and/or convert.

“Misleading” means that if an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, then in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading, there shall be taken into account (among other things) not only representations made or suggested by statement, work, design, device, sound, or in any combination of them, but also the extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of the representations or material with respect to consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under any conditions of use that are customary or usual.

“Mobile unit” means any vehicle on which frozen desserts are manufactured and which is used for the sale of frozen desserts and/or freezer milk shakes to the consumer.

“Mobile unit depot” means a building from which a mobile unit operates and where it is sanitized.

“Person” includes one or more individuals, a firm, partnership, corporation, or association.

“Retail manufacturer” means a person who manufactures frozen desserts for sale at retail and who is not a wholesale manufacturer as defined by this chapter.

“Sale” means any and every transaction including the barter, dispensing, distributing, delivering, serving, giving away, offer for sale, exposing, storing, or any other possession of frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes by any person whether as principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or employee where the products are subject to transfer to another person.

“Wholesale manufacturer” means a person who manufactures frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes for distribution to a second person for redistribution or for manufacturing purposes.

Where the term “and/or” is used, either word shall apply as the context requires.

Definitions and standards of identity for frozen desserts and frozen dessert mixes shall be established by regulations promulgated by the director of health under the authority of §

21-9-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3176, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-9-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 129, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 471, § 2.

21-9-2.
License required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to directly or indirectly manufacture, sell, distribute, receive for distribution, or hold in his or her possession or control any frozen dessert or frozen dessert mix for distribution, sale, or resale without first obtaining a license to do so from the director of health. Application for a license shall be filed with the director of health on forms prescribed and furnished by the director. The application shall include, among other things, the location of each plant at which frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes are to be manufactured into a form for distribution, sale, or resale and the brand name or names, if any, under which they are to be distributed, sold, or resold. In order to set the license renewal dates so that all activities for each establishment can be combined on one license instead of on several licenses, the department of health shall set the license renewal date. The license period shall be for twelve (12) months, commencing on the license renewal date, and the license fee shall be at the full annual rate regardless of the date of application or the date of issuance of license. If the license renewal date is changed, the department may make an adjustment to the fees of licensed establishments, not to exceed the annual license fee, in order to implement the change in license renewal date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 94, § 1.

21-9-3.
License fee.

The annual fees for the following licenses shall be as set forth in §

23-1-54

:

Instate wholesale frozen dessert processors;

Out of state wholesale frozen dessert processors; and

Retail frozen dessert processors.

Where a retail frozen dessert processor is also registered as a food service establishment under §

21-27-10

within a single location, the business shall not be required to pay more than one single fee for the highest classified activity listed in §

21-27-10

(e) or subsection (a) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 10 art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 37; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 30; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 5.

21-9-4.
Issuance of license.

The license shall be issued in the form and under any terms and conditions consistent with the intent and purpose of this chapter that shall be prescribed by regulations promulgated by the director of health under the authority of §

21-9-13

. The license shall be prominently posted in the plant to which it applies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-5.
Refusal, suspension, or revocation of licenses.

The refusal, suspension, or revocation of any license shall be made in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 238, §§ 1, 2.

21-9-6.
Appeals.

An appeal from any decision or order of the director may be taken by any aggrieved party to the superior court in the manner provided for in chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 388, §§ 3, 6; P.L. 1986, ch. 238, §§ 1, 2.

21-9-7.
Records of manufacturers.

Each manufacturer of frozen desserts and frozen dessert mixes shall keep for each frozen dessert plant operated by that manufacturer a true and complete record of milk and milk products received and frozen desserts and frozen dessert mixes manufactured there.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-8.
Repealed.

21-9-9.
Reports of wholesale manufacturers.

Each manufacturer of frozen desserts and frozen dessert mixes shall report to the director of health on forms prescribed by the director any information and at any times that the director may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 74, § 1.

21-9-10.
Repealed.

21-9-11.
Inspection and preservation of records, reports, and invoices.

The records, reports, and invoices required by this chapter shall be written in legible English. The original records required by §

21-9-7

and a legible copy of the reports required by §

21-9-9

shall be preserved and kept at the frozen dessert plant to which they apply for a period of one year from the date of the last entry on them. All records, reports, and invoices shall be open at all reasonable hours for inspection by the director of health and/or by the director’s authorized agents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 238, § 3.

21-9-12.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing of them shall be unlawful:

To advertise, sell or exchange, deliver, or offer or expose for sale or exchange, or to attempt to deliver, or have in actual or constructive possession with intent to do so any frozen dessert and/or frozen dessert mix unless:

The manufacturer of the product is a licensee under the provisions of §

21-9-2

;

The brand name of the product, the labeling affixed on it, or accompanying it, and/or the advertising of it gives a true and complete representation of the origin, character, composition, place of manufacture, and manufacturer, and is not false or misleading in any particular or misbranded as defined at §

21-31-11

.

To advertise, sell or exchange, deliver, or offer or expose for sale or exchange, or to attempt to deliver, or have in actual constructive possession with intent to do so any substitute or imitation frozen dessert or frozen dessert mix unless it is a special dietary frozen dessert which has been manufactured under regulations pertaining to it promulgated by the director of health under the authority of §

21-9-13

.

To sell or exchange, deliver, advertise or offer or expose for sale or exchange, or attempt to deliver, or have in actual or constructive possession with intent to do so, any frozen dessert or frozen dessert mix, ice cream, or ice milk:

If it contains any oils, or fats, other than milk fats, except when those fats or oils are specifically required under standards of identity or are naturally contained in the flavors lawfully used; or

If the frozen dessert and/or frozen dessert mix is adulterated as defined by §

21-31-10

.

To refuse to permit entry or inspection, or to refuse to permit the taking of a sample as authorized by §

21-9-19

.

To remove or dispose of a detained or embargoed article in violation of §

21-9-18

.

To fail to keep records as required by §

21-9-7

.

To refuse to make available and to afford full opportunity to check any record, report, or invoice as required by §

21-9-11

.

To fail to file reports with the director of health as required by §

21-9-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3176, § 6; G.L. 1956, §§

21-9-13

,

21-9-14

; P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 10, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 129, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 471, § 2.

21-9-13.
Regulations.

The authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of this chapter is vested in the director of health, and he or she is authorized to promulgate, among others, regulations, definitions, and standards which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter to govern the manufacture, labeling, transportation, advertising, and sale of frozen desserts and frozen dessert mixes, and the employee health standards and the sanitary conditions of the buildings, grounds, equipment, containers, and vehicles where those products are handled, manufactured, transported, sold, and/or stored.

Whenever the action will promote honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, the director of health shall promulgate regulations fixing and establishing for frozen desserts and frozen dessert mixes definitions and standards of identity and quality and reasonable standards of fill of containers. In prescribing a definition and standard of identity for frozen desserts and frozen dessert mixes in which optional ingredients are permitted, the director of health shall, for the purpose of promoting honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, designate the optional ingredients which shall be named on the label.

The definitions and standards promulgated under the provisions of this chapter shall conform as far as practicable to the definitions and standards promulgated under the authority of 21 U.S.C. § 341.

Hearings authorized or required by this chapter shall be conducted by the director of health or any officer, agent, or employee that the director of health may designate for the purpose.

The adoption of regulations shall be in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3176, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-9-15

; P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 238, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 36; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 46.

21-9-14.
Enforcement of chapter.

The director of health is authorized and directed to:

Administer and supervise the enforcement of this chapter;

Provide for any inspections and investigations that may be necessary to disclose violation;

Receive and provide for the investigation of complaints; and

Provide for the institution and prosecution of civil or criminal actions or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3176, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-9-15

; P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-15.
Violations reported to attorney general — Notice and hearing on violation.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general, to whom the director of health reports any violation of this chapter, to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the proper courts without delay and to be prosecuted in the manner required by law.

Before any violation of this chapter is reported to the attorney general for the institution of a criminal proceeding, the person against whom the proceeding is contemplated shall be given appropriate notice and an opportunity to present his or her views before the director of health or the director’s designated agent, either orally or in writing, in person, or by attorney, with regard to the contemplated proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-16.
Notice of minor violations — Warnings.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director of health to report for the institution of proceedings under this chapter minor violations of this chapter, whenever the director of health believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-17.
Injunctions authorized.

In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter the director of health is authorized to apply to the superior court for, and the court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter, irrespective of whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3176, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-9-16

; P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-18.
Embargoed articles — Condemnation and destruction.

Whenever the director of health or any of the director’s duly authorized agents finds, or has probable cause to believe, that any frozen dessert or frozen dessert mix is adulterated or misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent within the meaning of this chapter, or involved in a violation of this chapter or of the regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, he or she shall affix to that article a tag or other appropriate marking, giving notice that the article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed, and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of the article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the agent or the court. It shall be unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of the detained or embargoed article by sale or without permission.

When an article detained or embargoed under subsection (a) of this section has been found by an agent to be adulterated or misbranded, he or she shall petition the proper judge of the court in whose jurisdiction the article is detained or embargoed for a libel for condemnation of that article. When the agent has found that an article detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, he or she shall remove the tag or other marking.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, that article shall, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant of the article, under the supervision of the agent, and all court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be taxed against the claimant of the article or the claimant’s agent; provided, that when the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, the court, after entry of the decree and after costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that the article shall be so labeled or processed, has been executed, may by order direct that the article be delivered to the claimant of the article for the labeling or processing under the supervision of an agent of the director of health. The expense of the supervision shall be paid by the claimant. The article shall be returned to the claimant of the article on representation to the court by the director of health that the article is no longer in violation of this chapter, and that the expenses of supervision have been paid.

Whenever the director of health or any of the director’s authorized agents shall find in any room, building, vehicle of transportation, or other structure any frozen dessert or frozen dessert mix which contains any filthy, decomposed, or putrid substance, or that may be poisonous or deleterious to health or unsafe, it being declared to be a nuisance, the director of health or the director’s authorized agent shall immediately condemn or destroy it, or in any other manner render it unsalable as human food.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3176, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-9-16

; P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-19.
Inspection of establishments.

The director of health or any of the director’s duly authorized agents shall have free access at all reasonable hours to any frozen dessert plant in which frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes are manufactured or held for introduction into commerce, or to enter any vehicle being used to manufacture, transport, or hold frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes in commerce, for the purpose:

Of inspecting the frozen dessert plant or vehicle to determine if any of the provisions of this chapter are being violated, and

To secure samples or specimens of any frozen dessert and/or frozen dessert mix after paying or offering to pay for the sample. It shall be the duty of the director of health to make or cause to be made examination of samples secured under the provisions of this section to determine whether or not any provision of this chapter is being violated.

The director of health or any of the director’s duly authorized agents shall make the inspections and secure the samples or specimens at least once during each license year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-20.
Publication of court orders, judgments, and decrees — Dissemination of information.

The director of health may cause to be published from time to time reports summarizing all judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under this chapter, including the nature of the charge and the disposition of it.

The director of health may also cause to be disseminated information regarding frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes that the director of health deems necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the director of health from collection, reporting, and illustrating the results of the director’s investigations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-21.
Persons exempt from licensing requirements.

The provisions of §§

21-9-2

and

21-9-12(1)(i)

restricting the sale, possession, or control of any frozen dessert or frozen dessert mix to licensed persons shall not apply to the transfer of a frozen dessert or milk shake by a retailer to a purchaser, or to common carriers or to warehouse operators while engaged in lawfully transporting or storing the frozen desserts and/or frozen dessert mixes, or to any employee of any of those persons acting within the scope of his or her employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-22.
Violations of chapter — Penalty.

Any person that violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or of the regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and any principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or employee, who directs or knowingly permits a violation or who aids or assists a violation, shall upon conviction be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or to both the fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3176, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

21-9-17

; P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.

21-9-23.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter is declared unconstitutional or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of the chapter and the applicability of it to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected by that invalidity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 129, § 1.